Hawaii statutes.
[§261E-11] Suspension, change, and
revocation of certificates. (a) Certificates shall be effective from the
date specified and shall remain in effect until suspended or terminated as
provided in this section.

(b) Any certificate, upon application of the
certificate holder, in the discretion of the air carrier commission, may be
amended or revoked in whole or in part. Upon complaint, or on the commission's
own initiative, a certificate may be suspended, changed, or revoked in whole or
in part for wilful failure by the holder or any related company to comply with
this chapter, or with any lawful order or rule of the commission, or with any
term, condition, or limitation of the certificate. No certificate shall be
revoked except upon application of the holder unless the certificate holder or
any related company wilfully fails to comply, within a reasonable time that
shall not be fewer than thirty days and that shall be fixed by the commission,
with a lawful order of the commission, rule of the commission, or to a term,
condition, or limitation of the certificate or permit.

(c) The right to engage in transportation by
virtue of any certificate issued pursuant to section 261E-8 or by virtue of
temporary authority or approval granted under section 261E-9 or 261E-10, may be
suspended by the commission upon reasonable notice of not fewer than fifteen
days to the carrier, but without hearing or other proceedings, for failure to
comply by the carrier or any related company, with the terms of the certificate
or temporary authority or approval or with any lawful order or rule of the
commission regarding the certificate or temporary authority or approval. [L Sp
2008, c 1, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next